Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,277
Prohibited device; seizure; disposal.

Any device prohibited by sections 60-6,275 and 60-6,276 found as the result of an arrest made under such sections shall be seized, and when no longer needed as evidence, such device shall, if the owner was convicted of an offense under such sections, be considered as contraband and disposed of pursuant to section 29-820.

Laws 1982, LB 32, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,209;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 373.